North Dakota statutes. TITLE 61 Waters
CHAPTER 61-35 Water Districts

61-35-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Auditor” means the county auditor.

“Benefit unit” means the fee each member pays, for each service that is planned to be connected to the water system, for the privilege of using the district’s facilities.

“Board” means the board of directors of a district.

“Bond” means any revenue bond, refunding bond, or improvement bond, or other evidence of indebtedness of a district issued under this chapter.

“Director” means a member of the board of directors.

“District” means a water district organized under this chapter.

“Federal agency” includes the United States, the president of the United States, or any agency, instrumentality, or corporation of the United States which has been or may be designated or created by or pursuant to any act or acts or joint resolutions of the Congress of the United States or which may be owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by the United States.

“Holder of bonds” or “bondholder”, or any similar term, means any person who is the registered owner of any outstanding revenue bond, improvement bond, or refunding bonds.

“Law” means any statute of this state.

“Member” means an owner of real property that is located within a district, the tenant of the real property, or another person acting for the owner with the owner’s written consent.

“Participating member” means a member who has subscribed to and paid the established fee for at least one benefit unit in a district, in the manner provided by this chapter.

“Project” means any work, undertaking, enterprise, or any combination of two or more projects which a district is authorized to construct and from which the district has derived or may derive revenues. “Project” includes all improvements, betterments, extensions, and replacements of work, undertaking, or enterprises, and all appurtenances, facilities, easements, lands, rights in land, water rights, contract rights, approaches, dams, reservoirs, generating stations, sewage disposal plants, intercepting sewers, trunk connections, other sewer and water mains, filtration works, pumping stations, equipment, franchises, and structures in connection with or incidental to any work, undertaking, or enterprise a district is authorized to construct.

“Refinancing” means funding, refunding, paying, or discharging, by means of refunding bonds or the proceeds from the sale of refunding bonds, all or any part of any notes, bonds, or other obligations issued to finance or to aid in financing the acquisition, construction, or improvement of a project and payable solely from all or any part of the revenue or interest on the revenue of the project in arrears or about to become due whether or not such interest is represented by interest certificates.

“Refunding bonds” means notes, bonds, certificates, or other obligations of a district issued under this chapter, the proceeds of which are to be used to pay the principal of or interest on any outstanding bonds or other obligations.

“Revenues” means all fees, tolls, rates, rentals, and charges levied and collected by a district in connection with, and all other income and receipts of whatever kind or character derived by a district from, the operation of any project.

“Warrant” means an order drawn by the proper official of a district on its treasury, the warrant of order to be so drawn that when signed by the district treasurer in an appropriate place it becomes a check on the depository of such district, and a warrant upon the treasury may not be delivered or mailed to the payee or the payee’s agent or representative until the warrant has been signed by the district treasurer and entered on the district’s books as a check drawn on a bank depository.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2021, ch. 488, § 197, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Word defined by statute always has same meaning, see N.D.C.C. § 1-01-09.

61-35-02.
Petition.

A petition may at any time be filed with the department of water resources requesting the department to organize a district encompassing an area in one county or in two or more adjacent counties for the purpose of providing an adequate supply of water for the residents of the area. An area to be included in a district may not include property then included in any other district or included in the service area of a nonprofit corporation or cooperative association established under title 10 to operate a rural water system, except as otherwise permitted under section 61-35-25.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2021, ch. 488, § 198, effective August 1, 2021.

61-35-02.1.
Conversion of water resource district water supply system to water district.

A water resource district that has developed a water supply system under chapter 61-16.1 may convert that system to a water district as provided in this section. The water resource district board operating a water supply system may petition the department of water resources to organize a district in the manner provided by section 61-35-02. The signatures of the water resource district’s board of directors on the petition and a resolution adopted by the water supply system’s users approving the petition suffice in lieu of signatures of owners of fifty percent of the real property in the proposed district, if the petition presenter provides evidence satisfactory to the department that a sufficient number of members of the proposed district will subscribe or have subscribed to benefit units to make its operation feasible. The procedure for hearing and determination of disposition of the petition is as provided by this chapter. In any district organized upon the petition of a water resource board of directors, the following procedures apply:

After final approval of the petition by the department of water resources, the secretary of the water resource board shall file a notice with the secretary of state.

Upon filing of the notice, the assets and liabilities of the water supply system become the assets and liabilities of the newly organized district without any further meetings, voting, notice to creditors, or other actions by the members of the board.

The officers and board of directors of the water resource district are the officers and board of the district.

The applicable laws of the state governing the water resource district board control the initial size and the initial terms of office of officers and the board, in lieu of sections 61-35-08 through 61-35-11.

The district shall bring its operation and structure into compliance with the requirements of section 61-35-08 regarding the number and qualification of directors, section 61-35-09 regarding new bylaws, section 61-35-10 regarding dividing its directors into classes, and section 61-35-11 regarding board meetings at the first annual meeting of the participating members and board. The new district has all the rights and all the property of the original water supply system and is responsible for all its obligations. Title to any property is vested in the new district with no reversion or impairment of ownership rights caused by the conversion to a district. A water supply agreement entered by a water resource district is binding for its term on a successor district organized by the water resource district, unless otherwise agreed in writing by all parties to the agreement. The right of any creditor may not be impaired by this section without the creditor’s consent.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 594, § 1; 2021, ch. 488, § 199, effective August 1, 2021.

61-35-03.
Petition contents.

The petition must be signed by the owners of at least fifty percent of all real property lying within the outside perimeter of the area designated for inclusion in the proposed district and must state:

The location of the area, describing the area to be served or specifying the area by an attached map.

The reasons a district is needed.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-04.
Hearing after filing.

When a petition for the organization of a district is filed with the department of water resources, the department shall fix a time for a hearing on the petition not less than fifteen nor more than forty-five days after the filing of the petition. The department shall prepare a notice as required by section 61-35-05. At least seven days before the date fixed for the hearing on the petition, the notice must be published in the official county newspapers in the counties included within the district. The applicant shall pay all costs of the publication notice.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 1999, ch. 544, § 1; 2021, ch. 488, § 200, effective August 1, 2021.

61-35-05.
Contents of notice.

The notice prepared by the department of water resources must set forth:

The location of the area designated by the petitioners to be included in the proposed district, as described or shown by the original petition.

The time and place fixed by the department of water resources for the hearing on the petition.

That all owners or tenants of real property or other interested persons within the boundaries described may appear and be heard.

That the proposed district, if organized, has no power or authority to levy any taxes.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2021, ch. 488, § 201, effective August 1, 2021.

61-35-06.
Appearances.

At the hearing on the petition, any owner or tenant of real property or other interested person within the boundaries of the area described in the petition may appear, in person or by a designated representative, and any representative of the state or a political subdivision or an interested person may appear, in favor of or in opposition to the organization of the proposed district. The appearances may also be filed in writing before the time set for the hearing.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-07.
Findings — Order.

After the hearing, the department of water resources may strike off any part of the territory that testimony shows will not be benefited by the creation of the district. If the department does not find that the district is reasonably necessary, the department shall dismiss the petition. If the department finds the required notice of the hearing has been given and the proposed district is reasonably necessary for the public health, convenience, and comfort of the residents, the department shall make an order establishing the district as a political subdivision, designating its boundary, and identifying it by name or number. The order must be published in the same newspaper or newspapers that published the notice of hearing. The applicant shall pay all costs of the publication of the order. The department shall prepare and preserve a complete record of the hearing on the petition and the department’s findings and action.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 1999, ch. 544, § 2; 2021, ch. 488, § 202, effective August 1, 2021.

61-35-08.
Meeting of members — Election of board.

As a part of the order organizing the district, the department of water resources shall fix the time and place at which the members shall meet to select from their number a board of directors. Selection of the initial board may not be later than thirty days after the order is issued. The number of directors on the board, not to exceed nine, must be determined by a majority vote of those members present. Any member elected a director who fails to become a participating member, within thirty days after entry in the minutes of the board of a declaration of availability of benefit units for subscription, forfeits the office of director.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 1999, ch. 544, § 3; 2021, ch. 488, § 203, effective August 1, 2021.

61-35-09.
Bylaws submitted at special meeting.

Within thirty days after election of the original board, proposed bylaws must be submitted for adoption at a special meeting of members of the district, written notice of which must be mailed to each member. Members present at the special meeting may adopt or amend any of the proposed bylaws, and may propose and adopt alternative or additional bylaws by a majority vote. The bylaws may subsequently be amended at any annual or special meeting of the participating members of the district. However, the bylaws of each district must provide:

For an annual meeting of participating members each year after the year of organization of the district and for mailing of written notice of the time and place of each annual meeting to each participating member and publication of the notice in the official newspaper of the county or counties served by the district not less than ten nor more than thirty days before each meeting.

That each participating member of the district is entitled to one vote at all annual and special meetings of the district for each benefit unit to which the member has subscribed.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-10.
Directors divided into classes — Terms — Vacancies.

The initial board of each district shall divide its members by lot into three classes of as nearly equal size as possible. The terms of the directors in the first, second, and third classes expire on dates of the annual meetings in the first, second, and third years, respectively, following the year in which the district is organized, or as soon thereafter as their successors are elected and have qualified. At the annual meeting in each year after the year in which the district is organized, a director must be elected to succeed each director whose term of office expires on that date, and each director so elected holds office for a term of three years and until a successor is elected and has qualified. Vacancies must be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the remaining directors.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-11.
Board meetings.

The board shall meet annually on the same day as, and immediately following, the annual meeting of participating members, and may meet at other times it determines, or upon the call of the president or any two directors. At the first meeting of the initial board following its election, and at each succeeding annual board meeting, the board shall elect a president, vice president, secretary, and treasurer for the ensuing year. Board members are entitled to reasonable compensation to cover the expenses of serving on the board.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-12.
Powers of district board.

Each district board has the power to:

Sue and be sued in the name of the district.

Exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner provided by title 32 for the purpose of acquiring and securing any rights, titles, interests, estates, or easements necessary or proper to carry out the duties imposed by this chapter, and particularly to acquire the necessary rights in land for the construction of pipelines, reservoirs, connections, valves, pumping installations, or other facilities for the storage, transportation, or utilization of water and all other appurtenant facilities necessary to carry out the purposes of its organization.

Accept funds, property, and services or other assistance, financial or otherwise, from federal, state, and other public or private sources for the purpose of aiding and promoting the construction, maintenance, and operation of projects within the district.

Cooperate and contract with the state, its agencies, or its political subdivisions or any federal agency in research and investigation or other activities promoting the establishment, construction, development, or operation of projects within the district.

Furnish assurances of cooperation, and as principal and guarantor, or either, to enter into contracts with any federal agency, and with public corporations and political subdivisions of this state for the performance of obligations for the construction, operation, or maintenance of the district or for the delivery of water to any such department, agency, or political subdivision.

Construct, lease, or purchase separately or in cooperation with any federal agency or the state, its agencies, or political subdivisions, and to equip, maintain, and operate an office and principal place of business for the district, or other buildings or facilities to carry out activities authorized by this chapter.

Appoint and fix the compensation and reimbursement of expenses of such employees as the board deems necessary to conduct the business and affairs of the district and to procure the services of engineers and other technical experts, and to retain attorneys to assist, advise, and act for it in its proceedings.

Sell or exchange any and all real property purchased or acquired by the district. All money received from any such sale or exchange must be deposited to the credit of the district and may be used to pay expenses of the district.

Borrow money as provided in this chapter.

Issue and sell bonds in an amount or amounts determined by the board, including an amount or amounts for costs of issuance and financing, and any necessary reserve funds, for the purpose of financing the cost of a project.

Refund and refinance its bonds from time to time as often as it is advantageous and in the interest of the district.

Pledge any and all income, profits, and revenues received by the district in connection with the operation, lease, sale, or other disposition of all or any part of a project to secure the payment of bonds issued and sold to finance the project.

Pledge all or any part of any assessments levied under this chapter to secure the payment or redemption of any bonds issued in anticipation of the levy and collection of the assessments.

Acquire by gift, purchase, or the exercise of the right of eminent domain, property required to construct, reconstruct, improve, better, or extend any project, whether completely or partially within or outside the district, and easements, rights in lands, and water rights in connection with the project.

Operate and maintain any project for its own use and for the use of public and private consumers and users within and without the territorial boundaries of the district.

Prescribe, revise, and collect rates, fees, tolls, or charges for the services, facilities, or commodities furnished by the project, and in anticipation of the collection of the revenues of the project, issue revenue bonds to finance all or part of the cost of the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of any project.

Pledge revenues of the project to the punctual payment of principal and interest on bonds. A pledge under this subsection applies to the revenues of improvements, betterments, or extensions of the project which may be constructed or acquired after the issuance of bonds as well as the revenues of existing systems, plants, works, instrumentalities, and properties of any part of the project improved, bettered, or extended.

Make all contracts, execute all instruments, and do all things necessary or convenient in the exercise of its powers or in the performance of its covenants or duties or in order to secure the payment of its bonds, but an encumbrance, mortgage, or other pledge of property of the district may not be created by any such contract or instrument.

Enter into and perform long-term or short-term contracts with any nongovernmental unit for the provision and operation by the district of sewerage facilities, when the board of the district determines such action to be in the public interest and necessary for the protection of the public health, in order to abate or reduce the pollution of waters caused by discharges of industrial wastes by the nongovernmental unit, and for the payment periodically by the nongovernmental unit to the district of amounts the board deems sufficient to compensate the district for all costs associated with providing, operating, and maintaining the sewerage facilities serving the nongovernmental unit.

Enter into and perform such contracts and agreements with other districts, political subdivisions, and state institutions as the board deems proper and feasible concerning the planning, construction, lease, or other acquisition and the financing, maintenance, and operation of sewerage facilities. Any districts contracting with each other may provide in any contract or agreement for a board, commission, or such other body as their boards deem proper to supervise, manage, and operate the sewerage facilities and may prescribe its powers and duties and compensation of its members.

Accept from any authorized federal agency loans or grants for the planning, construction, acquisition, lease, or other provision of any project, and to enter into agreements with such agency respecting such loan or grants.

Contract debts and borrow money, pledge property of the district for repayment of indebtedness other than bonded indebtedness, and provide for payment of debts and expenses of the district.

Notwithstanding any other law, exercise the powers granted to a municipality under subsection 5 of section 40-33-01 and section 40-34-19, pursuant to the limitations set forth therein. A district may pay the cost of leasing any waterworks, mains, and water distribution system and any equipment or appliances connected therewith and any property related thereto pursuant to subsection 5 of section 40-33-01, or of any sewage system and all related property for the collection, treatment, purification, and disposal in a sanitary manner of sewage pursuant to section 40-34-19, solely from revenues to be derived by the district from the ownership, sale, lease disposition, and operation of the waterworks, mains, and water distribution system or sewage system; the funds or any other amounts invested by such district pursuant to section 21-06-07, or invested on such district’s behalf by the state, or any agency or institution of the state, in conformity with policies of the industrial commission, including investment in a guaranteed investment contract and any earnings thereon, to the extent pledged therefor; and funds, if any, appropriated annually by the board of the district or received from federal or state sources.

Enter and perform long-term and short-term contracts for the purchase or sale of water and to pledge any and all income, profits, and revenues received by the district to secure payment of the district’s obligations created by the contracts.

Property of the district may not be liable to be forfeited or taken in payment of any bonds issued under this chapter, and debt on the general credit of the district may not be incurred in any manner for payment of bonds under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2001, ch. 569, § 3; 2003, ch. 342, § 15; 2005, ch. 596, § 1.

61-35-13.
Contracts for construction or maintenance of a project.

If the cost of construction or maintenance of a project does not exceed the amount provided for construction of a public improvement under section 48-01.2-02, the work may be done on a day work basis or a contract may be let without being advertised. If the cost of the construction or maintenance exceeds the amount provided for construction of a public improvement under section 48-01.2-02, the lowest and best bid must be accepted. The board must comply with the requirements of sections 61-35-88 through 61-35-103 when bidding a project.

The competitive bid requirement of this section may be waived if the board determines that an emergency exists requiring the prompt repair of a project and a contract may be made for the prompt repair of the project without seeking bids.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2003, ch. 554, § 3; 2007, ch. 403, § 25.

61-35-14.
Financing project through improvement bonds or special assessments — Apportionment of benefits.

A board may acquire needed interest in property and provide for the cost of construction, alteration, repair, operation, and maintenance of a project with funds raised by special assessments. A board may issue improvement bonds in anticipation of the levy and collection of special assessments. If a board decides to acquire property or interests in property to construct, operate, alter, repair, or maintain a project with funds raised in whole or in part through special assessments, the assessments must be apportioned to and spread in proportion to benefits accruing to lands or premises benefited by the project. The board shall assess the proportion of the cost of the project, or the part of the cost to be financed with funds raised through levy and collection of special assessments which any lot, piece, or parcel of land bears in proportion to the benefits accruing to the property and any county, city, or township that is benefited.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-15.
Revenue bonds.

A district may issue revenue bonds, not exceeding an aggregate total outstanding of fifty million dollars, to finance construction of projects and incidental facilities authorized by this chapter. Issuance of revenue bonds must be approved by two-thirds of all of the members of the district board. The district shall pledge sufficient revenue from any revenue-producing facility constructed with the aid of revenue bonds for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds and shall establish rates for the facilities at a sufficient level to provide for the operation of such facilities and for the bond payments. Revenue bonds may not be a general obligation of any political subdivision and may not be secured by property taxes.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2007, ch. 562, § 1.

61-35-16.
Plans and specifications.

As soon as reasonably possible after organizing a district, the board shall file with the department of water resources copies of the plans and specifications for, and estimates of the cost of, any improvements authorized by this chapter which the board proposes to construct or acquire. The board shall determine a reasonable fee that each member shall pay for the privilege of utilizing the district’s facilities, which shall be known as a benefit unit. By publication in the official county newspaper of each county in which all or part of the district is located, the board shall describe generally the planned improvements, the area to be served, and the fee members will be required to pay for each service connected to the water system.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2021, ch. 488, § 204, effective August 1, 2021.

61-35-17.
Selling water.

If the capacity of the district’s facilities permits, the district may sell water by contract to any political subdivision, other district, or other person, public or private, not within the boundaries of the district.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-18.
Inclusion of property in district — Inclusion of municipality — Merger.

Owners of real property outside any district which can be served economically by the facilities of the district may petition to be attached to the district. The petition must be filed with the department of water resources, and the department shall proceed in substantially the same manner as provided by this chapter for filing of and proceeding on a petition for organization of a district.

All or part of an incorporated city may be included in the boundaries of any existing district or a district being newly organized, provided the governing body of the city by resolution or ordinance gives its consent.

Boards of two or more districts by concurrent action and by approval of the department of water resources may merge their districts into one. In case of merger, the members of the boards of the merged districts may serve until the next annual meeting at which time the district shall comply with the requirements of section 61-35-08 regarding the number and eligibility of directors, adopt new bylaws, and set the terms of the new board according to section 61-35-10. The resulting district shall take over all the assets and legal liabilities of the districts joining in the merger. Obligations of any district secured by the revenue of the systems operated by the district must continue to be required, or a sinking fund must be established for that purpose created from revenue from the system operated over the same area by the resulting district in accordance with the laws under which the obligations were issued, until all obligations of the old district have been retired.

If there is a conflict between two or more districts concerning which district will serve an area, the department of water resources, after a public hearing, shall determine which district can provide services more adequately and economically within the area.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2021, ch. 488, § 205, effective August 1, 2021.

61-35-19.
Taxing prohibited.

A district has no power to levy any taxes. The facilities constructed or otherwise acquired by any district, including ponds, reservoirs, pipelines, wells, deck dams, and pumping installations, the revenues obtained by the district from the sale of water, and the revenue bonds or interest on the revenue bonds issued by any district are not taxable in any manner by the state or a political subdivision.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-20.
Exclusion of real property from district.

If it becomes apparent that any real property included within a district but contiguous to a border cannot economically or adequately be served by the facilities of the district, the owners of the real property or the board may file with the department of water resources a petition requesting the real property be excluded from the district. The petition must:

Describe by full and partial section and by township and range, or by lot number and subdivision, the real property the petitioner proposes to exclude from the district.

State the real property cannot be served economically or adequately by the facilities of the district, and it is not feasible for the district to enlarge or extend its facilities to serve economically and adequately the real property.

Be signed by the owners of all the real property proposed to be excluded from the district or by all of the board.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2021, ch. 488, § 206, effective August 1, 2021.

61-35-21.
Inactive district dissolved.

A petition may be filed with the department of water resources requesting the department to dissolve an inactive district. The petition must:

List all real and personal property of any kind exclusive of records, maps, plans, and files and state all of its debts and obligations have been paid fully.

State the district is not functioning and probably will continue to be inoperative.

Be signed by three-fourths of the members of the district.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2021, ch. 488, § 207, effective August 1, 2021.

61-35-22.
Hearing.

Upon the filing with the department of water resources of a petition under section 61-35-20 or 61-35-21, the department shall fix a time for consideration of the petition. The department may hold a hearing on the petition. After consideration of the petition, and after the hearing if one is held, the department shall ascertain whether:

The petition meets all of the requirements prescribed by section 61-35-20 or 61-35-21.

It appears from all information available to the department that each allegation included in the petition is factual.

If the department’s finding on each of the foregoing points is positive, the department shall declare the real property described in the petition detached from the district or declare the district dissolved. The department shall notify the secretary of the district of the department’s action, and the secretary shall amend the records of the district to show the real property described in the petition has been detached from the district. Within thirty days, the secretary shall deliver to the department all records, maps, plans, and files of the dissolved district.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2021, ch. 488, § 208, effective August 1, 2021.

61-35-23.
Disposition of assets.

If a district is dissolved, the department of water resources shall provide for the disposition of any property owned by the district and for the apportionment of the proceeds and any other moneys belonging to the district to an adjoining district. If there is no adjoining district, the department shall apportion and dispose of the property and proceeds to the general fund of each county in the district in proportion to the county’s area in the district. Any pledge or lien given with respect to any outstanding bonds of the district remains and any property so encumbered must be handled in conformity with the bond resolution or trust indenture. Money, property, or the proceeds from property may not be distributed to any private interests.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2021, ch. 488, § 209, effective August 1, 2021.

61-35-24.
Not exempt from other requirements.

This chapter does not exempt any district from the requirements of any other statute under which the district is required to obtain the permission or approval of, or to notify, the state water commission, or the department of environmental quality, or any other agency of this state or of any of its political subdivisions before proceeding with construction, acquisition, operation, enlargement, extension, or alteration of any works or facilities that the district is authorized to undertake under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 2017, ch. 199, § 73, effective April 29, 2019.

61-35-25.
Alternate operation by nonprofit corporation or cooperative.

A nonprofit corporation or cooperative association established under title 10 for the specific purpose of operating a rural water system may petition the department of water resources to organize a district, in the manner provided by section 61-35-02. The signatures of the corporation’s or cooperative’s officers on the petition and a resolution adopted by the members in the manner provided in section 10-15-37 for amendments to articles or in the manner provided in chapter 10-33 for dissolution approving the petition suffice in lieu of signatures of owners of fifty percent of the real property in the proposed district, if the petition presenter provides evidence satisfactory to the department that a sufficient number of members of the proposed district will subscribe or have subscribed to benefit units to make its operation feasible. The procedure for hearing and determination of disposition of the petition is as provided by this chapter. In any district organized upon the petition of a nonprofit corporation or cooperative association, the following procedures apply:

After final approval of the petition by the department, the secretary of the corporation or cooperative shall file a notice with the secretary of state or attorney general, if applicable, in accordance with title 10.

Upon filing of the notice, the nonprofit corporation or cooperative ceases to exist as a title 10 entity and all assets and liabilities of the nonprofit corporation or cooperative become the assets and liabilities of the newly organized district without any further meetings, voting, notice to creditors, or other actions by the members of the board.

The officers and board of directors of the corporation or cooperative are the officers and board of the district.

The applicable laws of the state and the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the corporation or cooperative control the initial size and initial term of office of officers and the board, in lieu of sections 61-35-08 through 61-35-11.

The district shall bring its operation and structure into compliance with the requirements of section 61-35-08 regarding the number and qualification of directors, section 61-35-09 regarding new bylaws, section 61-35-10 regarding dividing its directors into classes, and section 61-35-11 regarding board meetings at the first annual meeting of the participating members and board. The new district has all the rights and all the property of the original corporation or cooperative and is responsible for all its obligations. Title to any property is vested in the new district with no reversion or impairment of ownership rights caused by the conversion to a district. A water supply agreement entered by a nonprofit corporation or cooperative association is binding for its term on a successor district organized by the nonprofit corporation or cooperative association, unless otherwise agreed in writing by all parties to the agreement. The right of any creditor may not be impaired by this section without the creditor’s consent.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1; 1999, ch. 50, § 78; 1999, ch. 544, § 4; 2021, ch. 488, § 210, effective August 1, 2021.

61-35-26.
Annexation of land by a municipality.

A district organized under this title or title 10 must be fairly compensated for losses resulting from annexation by a city under chapter 40-51.2. If a district has outstanding bonds, the annexation proceedings must be in accordance with the bond resolution or trust indenture. The governing body of a city and the board of directors of the district may agree to terms that provide that the facilities owned by the district and located within the city must be retained by the district for the purpose of transporting water to customers outside the municipality.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 601, § 1.

61-35-26.1.
Statement of intent.

It is the intent of the legislative assembly that potable water should be available in sufficient quality and quantity to meet citizens’ needs for a healthy and safe standard of living and to promote economic growth and development. In order to meet this objective in the most economical way, water service districts and city water service systems shall coordinate their service plans. Competition for users and duplication of service must be avoided whenever possible.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 488, § 1.

61-35-26.2.
Plans for water service by providers — Filing plans — Existing agreements.

A city planning to expand water service through annexation shall develop a city water service area plan. The city shall consult with any other water service provider, including a district, whose water service area is affected by the city’s water service area plan of the establishment of the plan.

The city shall file the city water service area plan with the commission. Upon filing of the plan with the commission, the city may proceed with water service to the annexed area as provided in section 61-35-26. A city water service area plan is enforceable when there is a water service agreement among the water service providers, including a district, that are encompassed by or which abut the water service area boundary.

Sections 61-35-26.1 through 61-35-26.4 do not supersede an existing water service agreement between a city and a district.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 488, § 2.

61-35-26.3.
State water commission funding.

Before providing a grant or loan to a district or city for a water service project in any area within the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of any affected city, the commission shall require that district and city to have a water service agreement. The absence of a water service agreement may not affect the funding by the commission of other projects for a district or city which are not related to potable water service and are not located within the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 488, § 3.